Hawaii statutes.
[§174C-56] Review of permits. At least
once every twenty years, the commission shall conduct a comprehensive study of
all permits issued under this chapter to determine whether the conditions on
such permits are being complied with. The commission shall prepare a formal
report to the legislature which shall be available to the public. [L 1987, c
45, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next